Florida, session 2026, SB910.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 316.1971, Florida Statutes, is created 23 to read: 24 316.1971âParking on public property.â 25 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 26 (a)ââPublic propertyâ means any publicly owned way or place 27 used by vehicles, including, but not limited to, streets, 28 roadways, highways, parking garages, and metered or timed 29 parking spaces or parking lots. 30 (b)ââPublicly owned buildings or facilitiesâ means a 31 building or facility owned by a state or local governmental 32 entity or agency. The term includes any building or facility 33 owned by a state university or Florida College System 34 institution. 35 (2)âA local government shall refund an owner of a vehicle 36 who pays a fee to park on public property, including public 37 property associated with publicly owned buildings or facilities, 38 any portion of such fee if the owner does not use the allotted 39 time. In the event a refund is not possible, the local 40 government shall carry over any unused portion of time for the 41 benefit of the next vehicle owner who pays a fee to park on the 42 same public property. 43 (3)âIf a vehicle is parked on public property, including 44 public property associated with publicly owned buildings or 45 facilities, in violation of a county or municipal law or 46 ordinance governing parking: 47 (a)âThe vehicle may not be towed until at least 12 hours 48 have elapsed from the time the vehicle was parked, if parked on 49 a street, roadway, or highway; or 50 (b)âThe vehicle owner may not be issued a traffic citation 51 until at least 2 hours have elapsed from the time the meter or 52 allotted time expired, if parked in a metered or timed public 53 parking space, public parking lot, or public parking garage. 54 (4)âA local government may not allow a private business 55 entity or enterprise to use public property for private parking 56 purposes for a fee. 57 (5)âThis section does not prohibit the governing body of a 58 county or municipality, with respect to public property under 59 its jurisdiction, from regulating the parking of vehicles for 60 any purpose. 61 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.